District of Columbia statutes.
47-4637

The Pew Charitable Trusts — 30-year limited real property tax abatement.

Forty percent of the annual real property taxes imposed by Chapter 8 of this title on the real property described as Lot 40, Square 377, that is owned by The Pew Charitable Trusts, shall be abated for 30 years; provided, that the real property continues to be owned by The Pew Charitable Trusts during the duration of the abatement period.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7122(b), 57 DCR 6242

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7122(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-4646, see §§ 2 and 3 of Samuel J. Simmons NCBA Estates No. 1 Limited Partnership Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-604, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11048).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of § 3 of D.C. Act 18-612, see § 713 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).

Short Title

Short title: Section 7121 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle M of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Pew Charitable Trusts Limited Tax Abatement Act of 2010”.